apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# ескі

%<R_SE%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# ескі дос
%<R_SE%>%<CMP%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ескірек заманда
%<R_SE%>%<CMP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}у CLITICS-INCL-COP ;        !# ескірек заманда Dir/LR

%<R_SE%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ол ескіні ертеден есінде сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы болған ақын."
%<R_SE%>%<CMP%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."
%<R_SE%>%<CMP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}у FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр." Dir/LR

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жоқ);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# көктемгі, басты, бар, жоқ

%<R_SE%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;         !# көктемгі су тасқыны
%<R_SE%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# "...Самаранч ең бастыны түсінді..."
                                    !# "Аты бардың заты бар."

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# ұлттық

%<R_SE%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ұлттық тағам

LEXICON A6                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without comparative reading,
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<R_SE%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                           !# example 1
%<R_SE%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# example 2
%<R_SE%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                     !# example 3

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
: GER-INFL ; ! Don't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION (V-INFL-COMMON)

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

! Pointed to by: V-PERS-S1 and V-PERS-AOR
! Irregular p1.sg form is in V-PERS-AOR

%<P1%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P2%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P5%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P6%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<P4%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P8%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<P1%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P2%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P5%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P6%>:%>ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P4%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P8%>:%>ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Алма театрға бара<aor><p3><sg> ма? – Алма в театр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;

%<P1%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;                ! Dir/LR

%<P3%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<P3%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR

%<P7%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<P7%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<P3%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<P7%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<P1%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P2%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P3%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P5%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P6%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P7%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P7%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

%<P4%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<P8%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C6%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C5%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<R_SH%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2014-08-16//FMT: this was "GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST"

LEXICON GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<C2%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2015-01-18//JNW: added <nom>, since it needs a case for transfer, and no other cases are ever added, or even presumed by the transducer to be okay.  But worth CHECK ing..
%<LATT%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} CASES ;
%<SML%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<S1%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<S2%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<S3%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<S5%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<S2%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<N1%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<N1%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<T2%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ET_ETB%>%<T2%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}с V-PERS-S1 ;

%<T2%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<T2%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}%>ш%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ; ! Dir/LR "...Менің қошақанымды қайда алып кетпекшісің?... (Экзюперидан)"

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<T1%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<T3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<T3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<T3%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-PERS-S1 ;

%<T3%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;         ! барыппын / бармаппын
%<T3%>%<evid%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;    ! бопты   ! Dir/LR

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;            ! Dir/LR
       ! for things like боп, сап, кеп, қап, қып, etc.
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<M3%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}ш%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;           ! Dir/LR
%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>й%{I%}нш%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;       ! Dir/LR
%<ET_KSE%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;

%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

! Gerunds
%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;  ! FIXME: check that e.g. no possession + accusative isn't valid (I think it is) -JNW
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<ET_ETB%>%<ET_ESM%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ger_obs%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

 LEXICON Adjectives
алқызыл:алқызыл A2 ; ! ""
аңғалақ:аңғалақ A2 ; ! ""
қола:қола A2 ; ! ""  ! FIXME: CHECK: might be n.attr
анализдік:анализдік A3 ; ! ""
желсіз:желсіз A3 ; ! ""
ұдайы:ұдайы A3 ; ! ""
ибалы:ибалы A3 ; ! ""
бірден%-бір:бірден%-бір A3 ; ! ""
бұраң:бұраң A3 ; ! ""
алаңғасар:алаңғасар A3 ; ! ""
бітіспестік:бітіспестік A3 ; ! ""
жаурынды:жаурынды A3 ; ! ""
әулие:әулие A3 ; ! ""
гүлжазира:гүлжазира A3 ; ! ""
тендерлік:тендерлік A4 ; ! ""
ансамбльдік:ансамбльдік A3 ; ! ""
қабырғалы:қабырғалы A3 ; !
қайқы:қайқы A2 ; !
қанжоса:қанжоса A3 ; ! ""
қаракүрең:қаракүрең A2 ; ! ""
қарып:қарып A2 ; ! ""
қималы:қималы A3 ; ! ""
қуатты:қуатты A2 ; ! ""
құбырлы:құбырлы A3 ; ! ""
құюлы:құюлы A3 ; ! ""
қызықтырарлық:қызықтырарлық A4 ; ! ""
қысық:қысық A2 ; ! ""
майда:майда A2 ; ! ""
манағы:манағы A3 ; ! ""
миналы:миналы A3 ; ! ""
нанғыш:нанғыш A2 ; ! ""
нобайлы:нобайлы A3 ; ! ""
орнындағы:орнындағы A3 ; ! ""
өздік:өздік A4 ; ! ""
өнімсіз:өнімсіз A2 ; ! ""
өткендегі:өткендегі A3 ; ! ""
сайлы:сайлы A3 ; ! ""
секірмелі:секірмелі A3 ; ! ""
сенгісіз:сенгісіз A2 ; ! ""
сериялық:сериялық A4 ; ! ""
суармалы:суармалы A3 ; ! ""
сырқат:сырқат A2 ; ! ""
таңдамалы:таңдамалы A3 ; ! ""
торлы:торлы A3 ; ! ""
түсініксіз:түсініксіз A2 ; ! ""
ұлы:ұлы A3 ; ! ""
фонетикалық:фонетикалық A4 ; ! ""
ызалы:ызалы A3 ; ! ""
бұттық:бұттық A4 ; !
өкімдік:өкімдік A4 ; !
пневматикалық:пневматикалық A4 ; !
төбелік:төбелік A4 ; !
агротехникалық:агротехникалық A4 ; ! ""
аналитикалық:аналитикалық A4 ; ! ""
атомдық:атомдық A4 ; ! ""
банктік:банктік A4 ; ! ""
буддалық:буддалық A4 ; ! ""
генетик:генетик A4 ; ! ""
гипографты:гипографты A4 ; !
дәлелдейтін:дәлелдейтін A4 ; !
дозиметрикалық:дозиметрикалық A4 ; !
еріткіш:еріткіш A4 ; !
жеңілдететін:жеңілдететін A4 ; !
заңсыз:заңсыз A6 ; ! "illegal"
зауықты:зауықты A4 ; !"Use/MT"
империялық:империялық A4 ; ! ""
қазіргі% заманғы:қазіргі% заманғы A4 ; ! "modern"
келіспейтін:келіспейтін A4 ; !
коммерциялық:коммерциялық A4 ; ! "commercial"
кристалдық:кристалдық A4 ; ! ""
мәжбүр:мәжбүр A4 ; ! "forced"
музыкалық:музыкалық A4 ; ! "musical"
оппозициялық:оппозициялық A4 ; ! "oppositional"
революциялық:революциялық A4 ; ! ""
теңкүшті:теңкүшті A4 ; !
формальды:формальды A4 ; ! "formal"
ырза:ырза A3 ; ! "" ! A3 not A4 - subst forms found in google
эмпирикалық:эмпирикалық A4 ; !
егжей%-тегжейлі:егжей%-тегжейлі A4 ; ! ""
лауазымды:лауазымды A4 ; ! "должностной"
адал:адал A3 ; ! "honest, acceptable"
атақты:атақты A3 ; ! ""
бүлінген:бүлінген A3 ; ! "corrupt" ! Use/MT
жылғы:жылғы A3 ; ! "year's" FIXME: GI
кібісе:кібісе A3 ; ! ""
қосымша:қосымша A3 ; ! ""
танымал:танымал A3 ; ! ""
бас:бас A3 ; ! "" ! probably not n.attr, but true null derivation
шынайы:шынайы A2 ; ! "true" ! A2 not A3 : comp forms found in google
асау:асау A2 ; ! ""
байыпты:байыпты A2 ; ! ""
айыпталушы:айыпталушы A3 ; ! ""
дербес:дербес A2 ; ! ""
есен:есен A2 ; ! ""
иен:иен A2 ; ! ""
күрделі:күрделі A2 ; ! ""
кәдуілгі:кәдуілгі A2 ; !"Use/MT"
лайық:лайық A2 ; ! ""
нәзік:нәзік A2 ; ! ""
тақуа:тақуа A2 ; ! ""
тиесілі:тиесілі A2 ; ! ""
шағын:шағын A2 ; ! ""
кедей:кедей A2 ; ! "poor"
дәмелі:дәмелі A2 ; ! ""
шұрайлы:шұрайлы A2 ; ! "fertile" ! CHECK A2
оңтүстік-батыс:оңтүстік-батыс A2 ; !
солтүстік%-шығыс:солтүстік%-шығыс A2 ; ! "northeast
ақ:ақ A2 ; ! "white" ! seems to be A2 -JNW
біржақты:біржақты A6 ; ! "" ! probably A6 not A1: no comp forms?
біртүрлі:біртүрлі A6 ; ! "" ! probably A6 not A1: no comp forms?
бөтен:бөтен A3 ; ! "other" ! was A1 -FMT
жас:жас A2 ; ! "young" ! Probably A2 not A1: no advl use?
кішкентай:кішкентай A2 ; ! "small, little" ! A2 not A1: no advl use?
қоңыр:қоңыр A2 ; ! "dark brown?" ! Probably A2 -JNW
қымбат:қымбат A2 ; ! "expensive"
мәңгі:мәңгі A6 ; ! "eternal" ! A6 not A1: no comp forms
мол:мол A6 ; ! "aplenty"?  ! FIXME: check POS and translation ! A6 not A1 because no comparative forms (at least occasional advl and subst)
риза:риза A3 ; ! "pleased,согласный(~satisfied)" ! A3 not A1, no comp or advl forms
сау:сау A2 ; ! "healthy" ! A2 not A1 - CHECK
тікелей:тікелей A6 ; ! "direct(ly), immediate(ly)"  A6 not A1 because no comp readings -JNW
уақытша:уақытша A6 ; ! "for the time being" ! Probably A6, not A1 -JNW
ұқсас:ұқсас A2 ; ! "similar" A2 not A1 because no advl usage
бекер:бекер A6 ; ! "vain, for nothing"
албан:албан A3 ; !"Use/MT"
шыдамды:шыдамды A2 ; ! "patient/steadfast"
бел:бел A4 ; !"Use/MT"
әдістемелік:әдістемелік A4 ; !"Use/MT"
тұңғиық:тұңғиық A2 ; !"Use/MT"
қызу% түсіретін:қызу% түсіретін A4 ; !"Use/MT"
ақшыл% көк:ақшыл% көк A2 ; !"Use/MT"
бүркемелі:бүркемелі A4 ; !
мөлшерлес:мөлшерлес A4 ; !
көнеленген:көнеленген A4 ; ! ""
арифметикалық:арифметикалық A4 ; !
 LEXICON Verbs
сал%<R_ETK%>%<ET_ETU%>:салыш GER-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Guesser
мемлекеттік:мемлекеттік A6 ; ! "governmental"
LEXICON Common ! <- future
сахаралық:сахаралық A2 ; ! ""
